Hawaii statutes.
§40-82.5 Delinquent accounts, collection.
Any state agency having an account due which is delinquent, may contract with a
collection agency bonded under chapter 443B for collection of the delinquent
account. The chairperson or director of the agency may make an agreement with
the agency regarding the amount to be retained by it for services. [L 1982, c
88, §1; am L 1990, c 34, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next